Utah statutes.
68-4-9.   Expenditures -- Oversight by Office of Legislative Research and
General Counsel.
(1)  No member of the commission may receive any compensation for that
member's services. However, each member shall receive a per diem and shall be
paid the actual traveling and other necessary expenses incurred in the
discharge of the commissioner's official duties.
(2)  The Legislature shall make appropriations to the Office of Legislative
Research and General Counsel to pay the necessary expenses of the
commissioners and to make appropriate contribution on behalf of this state to
the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, including any
expenses of a commissioner who has been elected as a life member of the
National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws.
(3)  The commissioners shall keep a full account of their expenditures in the
discharge of their official duties and shall report the account to the Office
of Legislative Research and General Counsel.
